Utah statutes.
17D-3-305.   Setting the date of an election of the board of supervisors -- Notice of the election.

(1)  The commission shall:

(a)  set the date of the election of members of the board of supervisors of a conservation district; and

(b)  publish notice of the election:

(i)  in a newspaper or other media outlet method with general circulation within the conservation district; and

(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(2)  The date set for an election under Subsection (1)(a) may not be later than six weeks after the date set by the commission for the close of nominations.

(3)  The notice required under Subsection (1)(b) shall:

(a)  state:

(i)  the date of the election;

(ii)  the names of all candidates; and

(iii)  that a ballot request form for the election may be obtained from the commission office or from any other place that the commission designates; and

(b)  specify the address of the commission office or other place where a ballot request form may be obtained.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

